Oklahoma, session 2025, SB496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 152, as last


amended by Section 111, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (51 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 152), is amended to read as follows:


Section 152. As used in The Governmental Tort Claims Act:


1. “Action” means a proceeding in a court of competent


jurisdiction by which one party brings a suit against another;


2. “Agency” means any board, commission, committee, department


or other instrumentality or entity designated to act in behalf of


the state or a political subdivision;


3. “Charitable health care provider” means a person who is


licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this


state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business

Req. No. 956 Page 1


or the practice of a profession and who provides care to a medically


indigent person, as defined in paragraph 9 of this section, with no


expectation of or acceptance of compensation of any kind;


4. “Claim” means any written demand presented by a claimant or


the claimant’s authorized representative in accordance with the


Governmental Tort Claims Act to recover money from the state or


political subdivision as compensation for an act or omission of a


political subdivision or the state or an employee;


5. “Claimant” means the person or the person’s authorized


representative who files notice of a claim in accordance with The


Governmental Tort Claims Act. Only the following persons and no


others may be claimants:


a. any person holding an interest in real or personal


property which suffers a loss, provided that the claim


of the person shall be aggregated with claims of all


other persons holding an interest in the property and


the claims of all other persons which are derivative


of the loss, and that multiple claimants shall be


considered a single claimant,


b. the individual actually involved in the accident or


occurrence who suffers a loss, provided that the


individual shall aggregate in the claim the losses of


all other persons which are derivative of the loss, or



Req. No. 956 Page 2


c. in the case of death, an administrator, special


administrator or a personal representative who shall


aggregate in the claim all losses of all persons which


are derivative of the death;


6. “Community health care provider” means:


a. a health care provider who volunteers services at a


community health center that has been deemed by the


U.S. Department of Health and Human Services as a


federally qualified health center as defined by 42


U.S.C., Section 1396d(l)(2)(B),


b. a health provider who provides services to an


organization that has been deemed a federally


qualified look-alike community health center, and


c. a health care provider who provides services to a


community health center that has made application to


the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for


approval and deeming as a federally qualified look-


alike community health center in compliance with


federal application guidance, and has received


comments from the U.S. Department of Health and Human


Services as to the status of such application with the


established intent of resubmitting a modified


application, or, if denied, a new application, no


later than six (6) months from the date of the

Req. No. 956 Page 3


official notification from the U.S. Department of


Health and Human Services requiring resubmission of a


new application;


7. “Employee” means any person who is authorized to act in


behalf of a political subdivision or the state whether that person


is acting on a permanent or temporary basis, with or without being


compensated or on a full-time or part-time basis.


a. Employee also includes:


(1) all elected or appointed officers, members of


governing bodies and other persons designated to


act for an agency or political subdivision, but


the term does not mean a person or other legal


entity while acting in the capacity of an


independent contractor or an employee of an


independent contractor,


(2) from September 1, 1991, through June 30, 1996,


licensed physicians, licensed osteopathic


physicians and certified nurse-midwives providing


prenatal, delivery or infant care services to


State Department of Health clients pursuant to a


contract entered into with the State Department


of Health in accordance with paragraph 3 of


subsection B of Section 1-106 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes but only insofar as services

Req. No. 956 Page 4


authorized by and in conformity with the terms of


the contract and the requirements of Section 1-


233 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


(3) any volunteer, full-time or part-time firefighter


when performing duties for a fire department


provided for in subparagraph j of paragraph 11 of


this section.


b. For the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


the following are employees of this state, regardless


of the place in this state where duties as employees


are performed:


(1) physicians acting in an administrative capacity,


(2) resident physicians and resident interns


participating in a graduate medical education


program of the University of Oklahoma Health


Sciences Center, the College of Osteopathic


Medicine of Oklahoma State University, or the


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services,


(3) faculty members and staff of the University of


Oklahoma Health Sciences Center and the College


of Osteopathic Medicine of Oklahoma State


University, while engaged in teaching duties,



Req. No. 956 Page 5


(4) physicians who practice medicine or act in an


administrative capacity as an employee of an


agency of the State of Oklahoma,


(5) physicians who provide medical care to inmates


pursuant to a contract with the Department of


Corrections,


(6) any person who is licensed to practice medicine


pursuant to Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


who is under an administrative professional


services contract with the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority under the auspices of the Oklahoma


Health Care Authority Chief Medical Officer, and


who is limited to performing administrative


duties such as professional guidance for medical


reviews, reimbursement rates, service


utilization, health care delivery and benefit


design for the Oklahoma Health Care Authority,


only while acting within the scope of such


contract,


(7) licensed medical professionals under contract


with city, county, or state entities who provide


medical care to inmates or detainees in the


custody or control of law enforcement agencies,



Req. No. 956 Page 6


(8) licensed mental health professionals as defined


in Sections 1-103 and 5-502 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes, who are conducting initial


examinations of individuals for the purpose of


determining whether an individual meets the


criteria for emergency detention as part of a


contract with the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services, and


(9) licensed mental health professionals as defined


in Sections 1-103 and 5-502 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes, who are providing mental


health or substance abuse treatment services


under a professional services contract with the


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services and are providing such treatment


services at a state-operated facility.


Physician faculty members and physician staff of the


University of Oklahoma Health Sciences Center and the


College of Osteopathic Medicine of Oklahoma State


University not acting in an administrative capacity or


engaged in teaching duties are not employees or agents


of the state.


c. For the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


employee shall include independent contractors and

Req. No. 956 Page 7


employees of independent contractors while actively


engaged in the transport of individuals in need of


initial assessment, emergency detention, or protective


custody as authorized by Section 1-110 of Title 43A of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


d. Except as provided in subparagraph b of this


paragraph, in no event shall the state be held liable


for the tortious conduct of any physician, resident


physician or intern while practicing medicine or


providing medical treatment to patients.


e. For purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


members of the state military forces on state active


duty orders or on Title 32 active duty orders are


employees of this state, regardless of the place,


within or outside this state, where their duties as


employees are performed;


8. “Loss” means death or injury to the body or rights of a


person or damage to real or personal property or rights therein;


9. “Medically indigent” means a person requiring medically


necessary hospital or other health care services for the person or


the dependents of the person who has no public or private third-


party coverage, and whose personal resources are insufficient to


provide for needed health care;



Req. No. 956 Page 8


10. “Municipality” means any incorporated city or town, and all


institutions, agencies or instrumentalities of a municipality;


11. “Political subdivision” means:


a. a municipality,


b. a school district, including, but not limited to, a


technology center school district established pursuant


to Section 4410, 4411, 4420 or 4420.1 of Title 70 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


c. a county,


d. a public trust where the sole beneficiary or


beneficiaries are a city, town, school district or


county. For purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims


Act, a public trust shall include:


(1) a municipal hospital created pursuant to Sections


30-101 through 30-109 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, a county hospital created pursuant to


Sections 781 through 796 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, or is created pursuant to a


joint agreement between such governing


authorities, that is operated for the public


benefit by a public trust created pursuant to


Sections 176 through 180.4 of Title 60 of the


Oklahoma Statutes and managed by a governing


board appointed or elected by the municipality,

Req. No. 956 Page 9


county, or both, who exercises control of the


hospital, subject to the approval of the


governing body of the municipality, county, or


both,


(2) a public trust created pursuant to Sections 176


through 180.4 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma


Statutes after January 1, 2009, the primary


purpose of which is to own, manage, or operate a


public acute care hospital in this state that


serves as a teaching hospital for a medical


residency program provided by a college of


osteopathic medicine and provides care to


indigent persons, and


(3) a corporation in which all of the capital stock


is owned, or a limited liability company in which


all of the member interest is owned, by a public


trust,


e. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, a housing authority created pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Housing Authorities Act,


f. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, corporations organized not for profit pursuant


to the provisions of the Oklahoma General Corporation


Act for the primary purpose of developing and

Req. No. 956 Page 10


providing rural water supply and sewage disposal


facilities to serve rural residents,


g. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, districts formed pursuant to the Rural Water,


Sewer, Gas and Solid Waste Management Districts Act,


h. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, master conservancy districts formed pursuant to


the Conservancy Act of Oklahoma,


i. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, a fire protection district created pursuant to


the provisions of Section 901.1 et seq. of Title 19 of


the Oklahoma Statutes,


j. for the purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act


only, a benevolent or charitable corporate volunteer


or full-time fire department for an unincorporated


area created pursuant to the provisions of Section 592


et seq. of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


k. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


an Emergency Services Provider rendering services


within the boundaries of a Supplemental Emergency


Services District pursuant to an existing contract


between the Emergency Services Provider and the State


Department of Health. Provided, however, that the


acquisition of commercial liability insurance covering

Req. No. 956 Page 11


the activities of such Emergency Services Provider


performed within this state shall not operate as a


waiver of any of the limitations, immunities or


defenses provided for political subdivisions pursuant


to the terms of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


l. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a conservation district created pursuant to the


provisions of the Conservation District Act,


m. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act,


districts formed pursuant to the Oklahoma Irrigation


District Act,


n. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any community action agency established pursuant to


Sections 5035 through 5040 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes,


o. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any organization that is designated as a youth


services agency, pursuant to Section 2-7-306 of Title


10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


p. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any judge presiding over a drug court, as defined by


Section 471.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes,





Req. No. 956 Page 12


q. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


any child-placing agency licensed by this state to


place children in foster family homes,


r. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a circuit engineering district created pursuant to


Section 687.1 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


s. for purposes of the Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a substate planning district, regional council of


government or other entity created pursuant to Section


1001 et seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


t. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


a regional transportation authority created pursuant


to Section 1370.7 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes


including its contract operator and any railroad


operating in interstate commerce that sells a property


interest or provides services to a regional


transportation authority or allows the authority to


use the property or tracks of the railroad for the


provision of public passenger rail service to the


extent claims against the contract operator or


railroad arise out of or are related to or in


connection with such property interest, services or


operation of the public passenger rail service.


Provided, the acquisition of commercial liability

Req. No. 956 Page 13


insurance to cover the activities of the regional


transportation authority, contract operator or


railroad shall not operate as a waiver of any


liabilities, immunities or defenses provided pursuant


to the provisions of the Governmental Tort Claims Act,


and


u. for purposes of The Governmental Tort Claims Act only,


an emergency medical service district established


pursuant to Section 9C of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution,


and all their institutions, instrumentalities or agencies;


12. “Scope of employment” means performance by an employee


acting in good faith within the duties of the employee’s office or


employment or of tasks lawfully assigned by a competent authority


including the operation or use of an agency vehicle or equipment


with actual or implied consent of the supervisor of the employee,


but shall not include corruption or fraud;


13. “State” means the State of Oklahoma or any office,


department, agency, authority, commission, board, institution,


hospital, college, university, public trust created pursuant to


Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes of which the State of Oklahoma is


the beneficiary, or other instrumentality thereof;


14. “State active duty” shall be defined in accordance with


Section 801 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 956 Page 14


15. “State military forces” shall be defined in accordance with


Section 801 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


16. “Title 32 active duty” shall be defined in accordance with


Section 801 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


17. “Tort” means a legal wrong, independent of contract,


involving violation of a duty imposed by general law, statute, the


Constitution of the State of Oklahoma, or otherwise, resulting in a


loss to any person, association or corporation as the proximate


result of an act or omission of a political subdivision or the state


or an employee acting within the scope of employment; provided,


however, a tort shall not include a claim for inverse condemnation.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-956 TEK 1/19/2025 5:37:31 AM





















Req. No. 956 Page 15